Hawaii statutes.
§507-16 Redemption prior to sale.
After publication of notice of the time and place of sale of an article or lot
of articles pursuant to section 507-14 and prior to the sale thereof, the
article or lot of articles may be redeemed and the lien thereon satisfied only
by payment of the amount of all charges incurred for the laundering, cleaning,
dyeing, or pressing thereof, plus twenty-five per cent of the amount of the
charges to cover all expenses incurred with respect to the article or lot of
articles. [L 1945, c 188, §4; RL 1955, §193-19; HRS §507-16]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next